District of Columbia statutes.
11-907

Absence, disability, or disqualification of chief judge.

(a)

When the chief judge of the court is absent or disabled, the chief judge’s duties shall devolve upon and be performed by such associate judge as the chief judge may designate in writing. In the event that the chief judge is (1) disqualified or suspended, or (2) unable or fails to make such a designation, the chief judge’s duties shall devolve upon and be performed by the associate judges of the court according to the seniority of their original commissions.

(b)

A chief judge whose term as chief judge has expired shall continue to serve until redesignated or until a successor has been designated. When there is a vacancy in the position of chief judge, the position shall be filled temporarily as provided in subsection (a).

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 483, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
June 13, 1994, Pub. L. 103-266, §§ 1(b)(12), (13), 108 Stat. 713
1973 Ed., § 11-907.
1981 Ed., § 11-907.
This section is referenced in § 11-911 and § 11-947.